Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.160

Joint educational facilities—Rules.

Any school district may cooperate with one or more school districts in the joint financing, planning, construction, equipping and operating of any educational facility otherwise authorized by law: PROVIDED, That any cooperative financing plan involving the construction of school plant facilities must be approved by the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, pursuant to such rules adopted relating to state approval of school construction.

[ 2006 c 263 s 323; 1995 c 335 s 604; 1990 c 33 s 359; 1969 c 130 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.58.075.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Conditional sales contracts for acquisition of property or property rights: RCW 28A.335.200.

Education of children with disabilities: RCW 28A.155.040.